cs: Typ mandolínového mostu: Nastavitelná; Kompenzovaná; Pevná; Jednodílná; Dvoudílná nastavitelná; Jiné
hu: Mandolin hídjának típusa: Állítható; Kompenzált; Fix; Egyrészes; Kétrészes állítható; Egyéb
fr: Type de chevalet de mandoline: Réglable; Compensé; Fixe; D’une seule pièce; Réglable en deux pièces; Autre
fi: Mandoliinin tallan tyyppi: Säädettävä; Kompensoitu; Kiinteä; Yksiosainen; Kaksiosainen säädettävä; Muu
es: Tipo de puente de la mandolina: Ajustable; Compensado; Fijo; De una pieza; De dos piezas ajustable; Otro
el: Τύπος γέφυρας μαντολίνου: Ρυθμιζόμενο; Αντισταθμισμένο; Σταθερό; Μονοκόμματο; Δύο τεμαχίων ρυθμιζόμενο; Άλλο
da: Type mandolinbro: Justerbar; Kompenseret; Fast; I ét stykke; Todelt justerbar; Andet
tr: Mandolin köprü tipi: Ayarlanabilir; Kompanzasyonlu; Sabit; Tek parça; İki parça ayarlanabilir; Diğer
lt-LT: Mandolinos tiltelio tipas: Reguliuojamas; Kompensuotas; Fiksuotas; Vientisas; Dviejų dalių, reguliuojamas; Kita
pt-BR: Bandolim ponte tipo: Ajustável; Compensada; Fixa; Peça única; Duas peças, ajustável; Outro
th: ประเภทของสะพานแมนโดลิน: ปรับได้; คอมเพนเซทเทด; แบบตายตัว; ชิ้นเดียว; ปรับได้แบบสองชิ้น; อื่นๆ
zh-CN: 曼陀林琴桥类型: 可调节; 补偿型; 固定; 一体式; 两件式可调节; 其他
bg-BG: Тип на мост за мандолина: Регулируемо; Компенсирано; Фиксирано; От една част; От две части, регулируемо; Друго
ru: Тип бриджа мандолины: Регулируемый; Компенсированный; Фиксированный; Цельный; Двухкомпонентный регулируемый; Другое
de: Typ des Mandolinenstegs: Verstellbar; Kompensiert; Fest; Einteilig; Zweiteilig verstellbar; Sonstige
vi: Kiểu bắt cầu đàn mandolin: Có thể điều chỉnh; Bù âm; Cố định; Một mảnh; Hai mảnh có thể điều chỉnh; Khác
en: Mandolin bridge type: Adjustable; Compensated; Fixed; One-piece; Two-piece adjustable; Other
it: Tipo di ponticello del mandolino: Regolabile; Compensato; Fisso; Pezzo unico; A due pezzi regolabile; Altro
ko: 만돌린 브릿지 타입: 조절식; 보상형; 고정식; 일체형; 2피스 조절식; 기타
nl: Mandoline brug type: Verstelbaar; Gecompenseerd; Vast; Eendelig; Tweedelig verstelbaar; Anders
sl-SI: Vrsta kobilice za mandolino: Prilagodljiv; Kompenziran; Fiksen; Enodelen; Dvodelen prilagodljiv; Drugo
pl: Typ mostka mandoliny: Regulowany; Kompensowany; Stały; Jednoczęściowy; Dwuczęściowy regulowany; Inne
ja: マンドリンのブリッジタイプ: アジャスタブル; コンペンセイテッド; 固定; 1ピース; 2ピースアジャスタブル; その他
nb: Mandolinens brotype: Justerbar; Kompensert; Fast; Endelt; Todelt justerbar; Annet
hr-HR: Vrsta mandolinskog Bridge: Prilagodljivi; Kompenzirani; Fiksni; Jednodijelni; Dvodijelni prilagodljivi; Ostalo
ro-RO: Tip punte de mandolină: Ajustabil; Compensat; Fix; Dintr-o bucată; Ajustabil din două bucăți; Altele
sv: Typ av mandolinbrygga: Justerbar; Kompenserad; Fast; I ett stycke; Justerbart i två delar; Annat
pt-PT: Tipo de ponte do bandolim: Ajustável; Compensada; Fixa; Peça única; Duas peças ajustáveis; Outro
sk-SK: Typ kobylky na mandolíne: Nastaviteľná; Kompenzovaná; Pevná; Jednodielna; Dvojdielna nastaviteľná; Iná
zh-TW: 曼陀林琴橋類型: 可調式; 補償式; 固定式; 單件式; 兩件式可調; 其他